el: Κατευθυντικότητα προσαρμογέα: Αμφίδρομο; Μονοκατευθυντικό; Άλλο
cs: Směrovost adaptéru: Obousměrný; Jednosměrný; Jiné
ko: 어댑터 방향성: 양방향; 단방향; 기타
ro-RO: Direcționalitate adaptor: Bidirecțional; Unidirecțional; Altele
hr-HR: Usmjerenost adaptera: Dvosmjerni; Jednosmjerni; Ostalo
zh-TW: 轉接器方向性: 雙向; 單指向性; 其他
bg-BG: Посоки на адаптера: Двупосочен; Еднопосочен; Други
hu: Adapter irányultsága: Kétirányú; Egyirányú; Egyéb
pl: Kierunkowość adaptera: Dwukierunkowy; Jednokierunkowy; Inne
th: ทิศทางของอะแดปเตอร์: แบบสองทาง; ไมค์ยูนิไดเร็คชันแนล; อื่นๆ
da: Adapterretningsbestemmelse: Tovejs; Ensrettet; Andet
fi: Sovittimen suuntaisuus: Kaksisuuntainen; Yksisuuntainen; Muu
ja: アダプターの方向性: 双方向; 単一指向性; その他
pt-BR: Direcionalidade do adaptador: Bidirecional; Unidirecional; Outro
tr: Adaptör yönlülüğü: Çift yönlü; Tek yönlü; Diğer
en: Adapter directionality: Bidirectional; Unidirectional; Other
ru: Направленность адаптера: Двунаправленный; Однонаправленный; Другой
nb: Adapterretning: Toveis; Enveis; Annet
lt-LT: Adapterio kryptingumas: Dvikryptis; Vienakryptis; Kita
fr: Directionnalité de l’adaptateur: Bidirectionnel; Unidirectionnel; Autre
sk-SK: Smerovosť adaptéra: Obojsmerný; Jednosmerný; Iné
de: Richtungsart des Adapters: Bidirektional; Unidirektional; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Usmerjenost adapterja: Dvosmerna; Enosmeren; Drugo
nl: Richtingsgevoeligheid van adapter: Bidirectioneel; Unidirectioneel; Andere
pt-PT: Direcionalidade do adaptador: Bidirecional; Unidirecional; Outro
es: Direccionalidad del adaptador: Bidireccional; Unidireccional; Otros
vi: Hướng bộ chuyển đổi: Hai chiều; Một chiều; Khác
it: Direzionalità dell'adattatore: Bidirezionale; Unidirezionale; Altro
zh-CN: 适配器方向性: 双向; 单指向; 其他
sv: Adapterriktning: Dubbelriktad; Enkelriktad; Övrigt